src/third_party/liblouis/src/tables/de-de-g2.ctb
# liblouis: German Grade 2 Braille
#
#  Copyright (C) 2009 SBS Schweizerische Bibliothek für Blinde und Sehbehinderte
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#-------------------------------------------------------------------------------
#
#  DEUTSCHE KURZSCHRIFT - German Grade 2 Braille - Germany, Austria
#
#  Version 2009-11-19
#  christian.waldvogel@sbszh.ch
#
#-------------------------------------------------------------------------------


include de-de-g0.utb
letsign 6

# All exception rules which use the letter "ß" are added BEFORE
# de-g2-core is included
always raufuß 1235-16-124-136-6-2346
always raufüß 1235-16-124-1256-6-2346
always beruß 23-1235-136-6-2346
always beiß 12-146-6-2346
always beimaß 2-12-134-1-6-2346
always demgemäß 2-12356-12346-134-345-6-2346
word außerdem 16-6-2346-12456-2-12356
midendword emaß 15-134-1-6-2346
midendword emäßig 15-134-345-6-2346-45
always mußestund 134-136-6-2346-15-23456-256-145
always mußestünd 134-136-6-2346-15-23456-1256-1345-145
always mädesüß 134-345-145-15-234-1256-6-2346
begmidword außengeländ 16-6-2346-14-12346-123-345-1345-145
always genieß 12346-1345-346-6-2346
always genuß 12346-1345-136-6-2346
always steingeiß 23456-1246-1245-146-6-2346
always habergeiß 125-1-12-12456-1245-146-6-2346
always herreiß 125-12456-1235-146-6-2346
midendword ßion 6-2346-245
midendword ßions 6-2346-245-234
always müßig 134-1256-6-2346-45
always ß 6-2346
syllable stöß 23456-246-6-2346
midendword sspaß 234-234-1234-1-6-2346
midendword sstoß 234-23456-135-6-2346
midendword sstraß 234-23456-1235-1-6-2346
always jakobstraß 245-1-13-135-12-23456-1235-1-6-2346
always einfallstraß 1246-124-12345-23456-1235-1-6-2346
begmidword karlstraß 13-356-123-23456-1235-1-6-2346
always fahrtstraß 2-1235-2345-23456-1235-1-6-2346
always fahrtsträß 2-1235-2345-23456-1235-345-6-2346
always begrüßungstrunk 23-1245-1235-1256-6-2346-136-234-2345-1235-256-13
always beißt 12-146-6-2346-2345

include de-g2-core.cti
